Montana, session 2025, HB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Duties of department during public health emergency. (1) If the governor has declared
a state of emergency pursuant to 10-3-303 that is considered a public health emergency, the department shall
make, at minimum, a twice weekly disclosure of health information in accordance with the confidentiality
requirements of 50-16-603 on the department's website and any other means considered necessary to
communicate to the public the total number of individuals:
(a) hospitalized in the state due to conditions, diagnoses, or other impacts to an individual's health
that have been identified by the governor as a basis for the public health emergency; and
(b) who have died as a result of conditions, diagnoses, or other impacts to an individual's health
that have been identified by the governor as a basis for the public health emergency.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3), for each category identified in subsections (1)(a) and
(1)(b) the department shall disclose:
(a) the number of individuals within the following age cohorts:
(i) 0 to 4;
(ii) 5 to 17;
(iii) 18 to 34;
(iv) 35 to 49;
(v) 50 to 64; and
(vi) 65 and older;
(b) the gender of individuals;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 253
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 253
(c) any period of hospitalization of the individuals related to the conditions, diagnoses, or other
impacts to an individual's health that have been identified by the governor as a basis for the public health
emergency;
(d) the date of death, if applicable;
(e) underlying conditions, if any, that may have contributed to the hospitalization or death of the
individuals; and
(f) if not disclosed pursuant to subsection (2)(e), for individuals who have died during the time
period for which the department is disclosing the information required in this section, personal characteristics or
conditions of the individuals that may be causally connected to mortality or morbidity known to be associated
with the public health emergency.
(3) If disclosure of the information required by subsection (2) would compromise privacy, the
department may alter how it reports the information, including age cohort groupings, or not disclose the
information.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
50, chapter 16, part 6, and the provisions of Title 50, chapter 16, part 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 253
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 253, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 253
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER
AN ACT REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES TO DISCLOSE
CERTAIN INFORMATION DURING A PUBLIC HEALTH EMERGENCY.